Utah statutes.
17-31-8.   Tourism tax advisory boards.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), any county that collects the
following taxes shall operate a tourism tax advisory board:
(i)  the tax allowed under Section 59-12-301; or
(ii)  the tax allowed under Section 59-12-603.
(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(a), a county is exempt from Subsection
(1)(a) if the county has an existing board, council, committee, convention
visitor's bureau, or body that substantially conforms with Subsections (2),
(3), and (4).
(2)  A tourism tax advisory board created under Subsection (1) shall consist
of at least five members.
(3)  A tourism tax advisory board shall be composed of the following members
that are residents of the county:
(a)  a majority of the members shall be current employees of entities in the
county that are subject to the taxes referred to in Section 59-12-301 or
59-12-603; and
(b)  the balance of the board's membership shall be employees of recreational
facilities, convention facilities, museums, cultural attractions, or other
tourism related industries located within the county.
(4) (a)  Each tourism tax advisory board shall advise the county legislative
body on the best use of revenues collected from the tax allowed under Section
59-12-301 by providing the legislative body with a priority listing for
proposed expenditures based on projected available tax revenues supplied to
the board by the county legislative body on an annual basis.
(b)  Each tourism tax advisory board in a county operating under the county
commission form of government under Section 17-52-501 or the expanded county
commission form under Section 17-52-502 shall advise the county legislative
body on the best use of revenues collected from the tax allowed under Section
59-12-603 by providing the legislative body with a priority listing for
proposed expenditures based on projected available tax revenues supplied to
the board by the county legislative body on an annual basis.
(5)  A member of any county tourism tax advisory board:
(a)  may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's services; and
(b)  may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of the
member's official duties.
